Utah statutes.
23-21-5.   State-owned lands authorized for use as wildlife management areas, fishing waters and for other recreational activities.

The Wildlife Board is authorized to use any and all unsurveyed state-owned lands below the 1855 meander line of the Great Salt Lake within the following townships for the creation, operation, maintenance and management of wildlife management areas, fishing waters and other recreational activities.

Township 2 South, Range 5 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 2 South, Range 4 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 1 South, Range 5 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 1 South, Range 4 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 1 South, Range 3 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 1 North, Range 3 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 1 North, Range 2 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 2 North, Range 3 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 2 North, Range 2 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 2 North, Range 1 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 3 North, Range 3 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 3 North, Range 2 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 3 North, Range 1 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 4 North, Range 3 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 4 North, Range 2 West, S.L.B. and M.; Sections 1, 2, 11, 12, 13, 14, 23, and 24, Township 4 North, Range 4 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 5 North, Range 3 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 5 North, Range 4 West, S.L.B. and M.; Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 11, and 12, Township 5 North, Range 5 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 6 North, Range 5 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 6 North, Range 4 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 6 North, Range 3 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 7 North, Range 5 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 7 North, Range 4 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 7 North, Range 3 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 7 North, Range 2 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 8 North, Range 5 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 8 North, Range 4 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 8 North, Range 3 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 8 North, Range 2 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 9 North, Range 5 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 9 North, Range 4 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 11 North, Range 11 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 11 North, Range 10 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 11 North, Range 9 West, S.L.B. and M.; Township 11 North, Range 8 West, S.L.B. and M.; North 1/2 of Township 10 North, Range 10 West, S.L.B. and M.; North 1/2 of Township 10 North, Range 9 West, S.L.B. and M.; North 1/2 of Township 10 North, Range 8 West, S.L.B. and M.



Amended by Chapter 60, 1975 General Session

